Massachusetts, session 194th, H5607.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding clause Fifty-fourth of section 5 of chapter 59 of the 
General Laws or any other general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the city of 
Cambridge shall be permitted to allow for exemption from taxation of personal property not in 
excess of $30,000 of value. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.